Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1101
Fire Recognition Day; designation.

The second Saturday in May is designated and shall be known as Fire Recognition Day, and exercises appropriate for the subject and day may be exercised by any fire department.

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 2.

State Fire Day, see section 79-705.